Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.380

Waiver or delay of collection of tap-in charges, connection or hookup fees for low-income persons and certain organizations.

Whenever a city or town waives or delays collection of tap-in charges, connection fees, or hookup fees for low-income persons, a class of low-income persons, or a nonprofit organization, public development authority, housing authority, or local agency that provides emergency shelter, transitional housing, permanent supportive housing, or affordable housing as defined in RCW 35.92.385 to connect to lines or pipes used by the city or town to provide utility service, the waiver or delay shall be pursuant to a program established by ordinance. As used in this section, the provision of "utility service" includes, but is not limited to, water, sanitary or storm sewer service, electricity, gas, other means of power, and heat.

[ 2023 c 249 s 2; 1980 c 150 s 1.]